Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB783.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Tourism Improvement District Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." A body politic and corporate, created under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56 (relating to municipal authorities)."Benefited business." A hotel, as defined under section 209 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, that is located within a tourism 12345678910111213141516171819 improvement district and benefits from tourism improvement district activities as outlined in the tourism improvement district plan."County." A county located within this Commonwealth."Nonprofit corporation." A legal entity that is incorporated in this Commonwealth and specifies in its charter or bylaws that no part of the net earnings may benefit a private shareholder or individual holding an interest in the entity."Special assessment fee." The fee assessed on benefited businesses levied by the county establishing a tourism improvement district for the purposes of providing tourism activities."Substantial amendment." An amendment to a preliminary plan or an amendment to a final plan that does any of the following:(1) Removes or adds tourism activities to be provided in a tourism improvement district.(2) Increases expenditures in a tourism improvement district management association's budget by more than 25% for a single fiscal year.(3) Incurs additional indebtedness.(4) Changes the method for determining the amount of the special assessment fee.(5) Change of the tourism improvement district management association that administers tourism activities within the tourism improvement district.(6) Changes the tourism improvement district's geographic boundary.(7) Changes the characteristics of a benefited business."Total room inventory." The number of rooms available for occupancy across the benefited business within a tourism 20250SB0783PN0889 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvement district."Tourism activities." An activity, service or improvement that provides a benefit to benefited businesses, including any of the following:(1) Marketing, sales, event promotion and other promotional programs designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district.(2) Funding of special events designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district.(3) Destination product development activities designed to improve the visitor experience in a tourism improvement district.(4) The personnel and administrative support necessary to provide tourism activities.(5) The funding of improvements, including the acquisition, construction, installation or maintenance relating to tangible property, with an estimated useful life of five years or more that is designed to provide benefits to assessed businesses.(6) Any other activity, service or improvement that is designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district."Tourism improvement district" or "TID." A geographical area encompassing benefited businesses as proposed in a tourism improvement district plan and approved by a county ordinance."Tourism improvement district management association" or "TIDMA." The body that manages a tourism improvement district."Tourism improvement district plan." The strategic plan for tourism activities within a tourism improvement district.Section 3. Establishment of tourism improvement districts.20250SB0783PN0889 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--A benefited business may petition and present a preliminary plan to the county to establish a TID in the county.(b) Specific procedures.--(1) The county shall hold a public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on the preliminary plan for a proposed TID. At least 30 days prior to the public hearing the following shall be provided by the county to the extent reasonably practical to each benefited business located in the proposed TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the office in the county that maintains tax assessment records:(i) A copy of the petition.(ii) A summary of the preliminary plan.(iii) Objection procedures.(iv) Amendment procedures.(v) The date, location and time of the public hearing.(2) Objections to the proposed TID may be filed by benefited businesses or authorized representatives in accordance with the following:(i) Objections shall be in writing, signed by the benefited business owner or an authorized representative, and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(ii) Objections must be filed in the office of the chief clerk of the county in which the TID is being proposed no later than three days prior to a vote by the county on the ordinance establishing a TID.(iii) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of 20250SB0783PN0889 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the total room inventory within the proposed TID file objections, the county shall be prohibited from enacting the ordinance establishing the TID.(c) Contents of preliminary plan.--The preliminary plan shall include all of the following:(1) A map indicating the boundaries of the proposed TID.(2) A written report containing the following information relating to the proposed TID:(i) The name.(ii) A detailed description of the geographic boundaries.(iii) A list of proposed tourism activities and their estimated cost.(iv) The characteristics of a benefited business.(v) A proposed budget for the first fiscal year, including:(A) A reimbursement to the county for the mailing of a notice required under this act.(B) Tourism activities.(vi) A proposed plan for the use of funds for the upcoming five years.(vii) The proposed revenue sources for financing all proposed tourism activities.(viii) The estimated time for implementation and completion of all proposed tourism activities.(ix) A statement identifying the TIDMA that will administer the proposed TID.(x) The method for determining the amount of the special assessment fee to be levied, which may be based on a percentage of gross rental revenue or a fixed rate 20250SB0783PN0889 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 per occupied room per night. The fee may be placed on the transaction receipt and shall be collected by the benefited businesses and remitted to the county.(3) Draft statements of duties between the county and the TIDMA that include the following:(i) respective duties and responsibilities of the county and the TIDMA;(ii) a requirement that the county maintains the same level of programs and services provided within the proposed TID related to tourism after TID enactment;(iii) a requirement that district funds for tourism activities are intended to be supplemental to existing funding for tourism in a county so that a county shall not reduce the existing tourism funding as a result of the formation of a tourism improvement district; and(iv) a requirement that the county shall collect all special assessment fees levied within the proposed TID. The county may charge an administrative fee not to exceed 4% of the total special assessment fees collected in any fiscal year for a given TID. A county shall collect the fees and deposit the revenues received from the fee in a special fund established for that purpose. The county shall remit the fees, less the county's administrative fee, to the TIDMA not later than 60 days after receipt of the revenues.(d) Final plan.--Prior to the establishment of a proposed TID, the county shall provide the final plan to the office of the chief clerk for the county. The final plan shall incorporate amendments made to the preliminary plan based on comments from benefited business owners or their authorized representatives 20250SB0783PN0889 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided at the public hearings or at some other time prior to approval of the final plan. At least 30 days prior to the vote by the county on the ordinance establishing the TID, the county shall make the final plan available on the county's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Additional public hearing for substantial amendment to preliminary plan.--If the final plan includes a substantial amendment from the preliminary plan, prior to voting on the ordinance establishing the proposed TID, the county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on a substantial amendment to the preliminary plan and contained in the final plan. Notice of the hearing shall follow procedures outlined in subsection (b).(f) Amendments to approved final plan.--The following shall apply to amendments to an approved final plan:(1) A substantial amendment to the final plan may only be proposed by a TIDMA to a county upon the recommendation of a two-thirds majority of the TIDMA board.(2) A substantial amendment to the final plan shall only be adopted by a county following the submission of the proposed substantial amendment by a TIDMA and completion of all of the following:(i) At least 30 days prior to the vote on the substantial amendment to the final plan, the county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on the substantial amendment to the final plan. Notice of the hearing shall follow procedures outlined in subsection (b).(ii) For changes to a TID's service area boundary, each benefited business proposed to be added to the TID 20250SB0783PN0889 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be notified at least 30 days prior to the public hearing provided for under subparagraph (i). The notice shall be provided via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collectors office. The notice shall contain the date, time and location of the public hearing and instructions on how to access a copy of the final approved plan and proposed substantial amendment. At the county's discretion, the county may add a physical copy of the final plan and proposed substantial amendment to the notice.(iii) Objections to the proposed substantial amendment to the final plan may be filed by benefited businesses or authorized representatives located within the TID and the proposed expanded TID service area boundary in accordance with the following:(A) Objections shall be in writing, signed by the benefited business owner or an authorized representative and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(B) Objections must be filed in the office of the chief clerk of the county in which the TID is being proposed no later than three days prior to a vote by the county on the substantial amendment to the final plan.(C) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within the proposed TID or the proposed expanded TID service area boundary file objections, the county shall be prohibited from 20250SB0783PN0889 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adopting the substantial amendment to the final plan.(iv) Within 30 days from the public hearing provided under subparagraph (i), the county may approve or disapprove the substantial amendment to the final plan. If approved, the substantial amendment to the final plan shall take effect upon the date of the approval if not otherwise specified in the final plan.Section 4. Powers of counties.Each county shall have the power to:(1) Establish within the county an area or areas designated as a TID. The following shall apply to the establishment of a TID:(i) A county may establish multiple TIDs within the boundaries of the county.(ii) A county may establish a TID that only includes certain classifications of benefited businesses, including total room inventory.(iii) A benefited business may not be included in more than one TID.(iv) A county may levy a special assessment fee on benefited businesses within the geographic boundaries of the TID for the purpose of providing tourism activities as specified in the final plan.(2) Form a TIDMA by establishing an authority to administer the TID, designating an existing nonprofit corporation to administer the TID or creating a new nonprofit corporation to administer the TID. The TIDMA must be incorporated as a nonprofit corporation in this Commonwealth or as an authority.(3) Acquire, by gift, purchase or eminent domain, land, 20250SB0783PN0889 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 real property or rights-of-way which may be needed for the purposes of the TID, in accordance with the tourism improvement district final plan and applicable law.(4) Form a TID for a minimum initial duration of five years, after which the TID shall be subject to renewal or termination by the county.Section 5. Establishment of tourism improvement district management associations.(a) Association designated.--When a county establishes a TID under this act, a TIDMA shall be designated by the county to administer tourism activities within the TID according to the tourism improvement district plan.(b) Body.--Each TIDMA shall have an administrative body in accordance with the following:(1) Where a newly formed nonprofit corporation is designated as the TIDMA, the certificate of incorporation or bylaws shall provide that the administrative body shall be composed only of benefited business owners or authorized representatives. A representative of the county may have a seat on the governing board.(2) Where an existing nonprofit corporation is designated as the TIDMA, the nonprofit shall create an administrative body composed only of benefited business owners or authorized representatives who shall be charged with managing the funds raised by the district and fulfilling the obligations of the district plan. A representative of the county may have a seat on the administrative body.(3) Where an authority serves as the TIDMA, the administrative body shall be appointed under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56 (relating to municipal authorities). Notwithstanding 53 20250SB0783PN0889 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56, the administrative body of an authority created to serve as a TIDMA shall be composed only of benefited business owners or their authorized representatives. A representative of the county may have a seat on the administrative body.Section 6. Powers of tourism improvement district management associations.(a) General powers.--A TIDMA, in accordance with the final plan, shall have the power to:(1) Sue or be sued, implead or be impleaded, complain and defend in all courts.(2) Employ an executive director or administrator and any necessary supporting staff or contract for the provision of same.(3) Prepare planning or feasibility studies or contract for the preparation of planning or a feasibility study to determine needed tourism activities or administrative programs and services within the TID.(4) Make, conduct or facilitate tourism activities within a TID.(5) Purchase, own, construct, renovate, develop, operate, rehabilitate, manage, sell or dispose of real property.(6) Contract with existing businesses and other TIDMAs or authorities within or outside of the TID.(7) Appropriate and expend TID funds, including Federal, State or municipal funds received by the TIDMA in accordance with specific provisions contained in the final plan and in accordance with the purposes of the tourism improvement district plan.20250SB0783PN0889 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Special assessment fees.--(1) Revenues from the special assessment fee shall be accounted for and used by the TIDMA to provide tourism activities within the TID in accordance with the purposes of the tourism improvement district plan. The TIDMA may exempt a business category or a category based on benefit.(2) A special assessment fee shall be provided for in the final plan and comply with the requirements of section 4(1)(iv). If the aggregate amount of all special assessment fees levied by the county during the year exceeds the estimated cost of proposed tourism activities for the year, not including county administrative costs, the fees shall be carried over and used for tourism activities within the TID in the next fiscal year.Section 7. Dissolution of tourism improvement district.(a) Request for termination.--A written request for the termination of a TID may be filed by the benefited businesses or authorized representatives that represent at least 40% of the total room inventory within the TID. The request shall be filed in the office of the clerk for the county in which the TID is located. Upon receipt of a request for termination, the county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment before approving a request terminating the TID. Notice of the hearing shall follow procedures outlined in section 3(b). If the benefited businesses or authorized representatives that represent more than 40% of the total room inventory within the TID do not object to the termination of the TID in writing to the county within 10 days after the public hearing and there is no outstanding and unpaid indebtedness incurred to accomplish a purpose of the TID, the county shall 20250SB0783PN0889 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pass an ordinance terminating the TID. Ownership in assets of the TIDMA shall transfer to the county.(b) Termination by the county.--A TID that does not have outstanding and unpaid indebtedness incurred to accomplish a purpose of the TID may be dissolved by an ordinance of the county if the county finds that there has been misappropriation of funds, malfeasance or a violation of law in connection with the management of the TID. Prior to the county enacting an ordinance terminating a TID, the county shall hold at least one public hearing to determine by verification or reasonable certainty if there has been misappropriation of funds, malfeasance or a violation of law in connection with the management of the TID. The county shall publish notice of the public hearing and follow procedures outlined in section 3(b). Upon approval of the termination by the county, the property ownership of assets of the TIDMA shall transfer to the county.Section 8. Annual audit.A TIDMA shall annually submit:(1) An independent third-party audit of the income and expenditures and programmatic information to the clerk of the county in which the TID is located within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year.(2) A copy of the audit to all benefited businesses in the TID within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0783PN0889 - 13 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526